Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 5. Juvenile Justice Information System [Renumbered to Wyo. Stat. Title 14, Ch. 6, Art. 6, effective July 1, 2024]

History.

Renumbered to Wyo. Stat. Title 14, Ch. 6, Art. 6 by 2022 ch. 15, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 7-19-501.
Definitions. [Renumbered to Wyo. Stat. § 14-6-601, effective July 1, 2024]

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

14-6-601

by 2022 ch. 15, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 7-19-502.
Record system created. [Renumbered to Wyo. Stat. § 14-6-602, effective July 1, 2024]

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

14-6-602

by 2022 ch. 15, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-19-501(a)(viii).

§ 7-19-503.
Collection of juvenile justice information. [Renumbered to Wyo. Stat. § 14-6-603, effective July 1, 2024]

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

14-6-603

by 2022 ch. 15, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 7-19-504.
Access to and dissemination of information. [Renumbered to Wyo. Stat. § 14-6-604, effective July 1, 2024]

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

14-6-604

by 2022 ch. 15, § 3, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 7-19-505.
Inspection of information. [Renumbered to Wyo. Stat. § 14-6-605, effective July 1, 2024]

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 118, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

14-6-605

by 2022 ch. 15, § 4, effective July 1, 2024.